California, session 20252026, SB370.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12098.9 is added to the Government Code, to read:12098.9. (a) The California Music Festival Preservation Grant Program is hereby established within the office.(b) The program shall be under the direct authority of the director, and the office shall administer grants to eligible independent live music events promoters in accordance with this section.(c) The purpose of the program is to provide grants to eligible independent live music events promoters in order to support their continued ability to provide equitable access to the arts for all Californians.(d) For purposes of this section, “eligible independent live music events promoter” means an entity that satisfies all of the following:(1) It is a sole proprietor, C-corporation, S-corporation, cooperative, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, or a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.(2) It, as a principal business activity, organizes, promotes, produces, manages, or hosts live concerts, festivals, or other events featuring performing artists at an eligible venue where both of the following take place:(A) A cover charge through ticketing or front door entrance fee is applied.(B) Performers are paid.(3) At least 70 percent of the earned revenue of the entity is generated through cover charges or ticket sales, production fees, or production reimbursements, or the sale of event beverages, food, or merchandise.(e) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature:(1) The office shall allocate grants to eligible independent live music events promoters that meet the requirements of this section.(2) The amount of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be allocated in one or more rounds to eligible independent live music events promoters.SECTION 1.(a)It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation that would provide equitable access and economic development opportunities for music festivals.(b)The Legislature finds and declares all of the following regarding enhancing equitable access to music festivals:(1)Music festivals and large community gatherings have a significant economic impact on local cities and the State of California.(2)In 2023, a study found that 34 percent of surveyed adults in the United States had attended a music festival more than once.(3)Music festivals attract visitors, which increases sales at local businesses, including restaurants, hotels, retails shops, transportation businesses, and other services.(4)Music festivals create temporary and permanent jobs, such as security, catering, vendors, transportation, event staff, and artists.(5)The success of music festivals attracts investments in real estate, local businesses, and other sectors in cities that host music festivals.(6)Music festivals attract businesses throughout the host city and serve as national and international tourist destinations.